District of Columbia statutes.
29-923

Eligibility and admission to membership.

Any individual, association, corporation, incorporated or unincorporated group organized on a cooperative basis, any nonprofit group, or other entity shall be eligible for membership in an association if it has met the qualifications for eligibility, if any, stated in the articles or bylaws and shall be deemed a member upon payment in full for the par value of the minimum amount of share or membership capital stated in the articles as necessary to qualify for membership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-902.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 29-923.
1981 Ed., § 29-1123.
1973 Ed., § 29-823.

Prior Codifications